glossing/lexicons/nom_rules.lexc
LEXICON Case-prefixes

@P.CASE.com@COM%-:@P.CASE.com@г%{Æ%}%> N-deriv-prefixes ;
@P.CASE.assoc@ASSOC%-:@P.CASE.assoc@га%> N-deriv-prefixes ;
@P.CASE.prv@CAR%-:@P.CASE.prv@%{Æ%}%> N-deriv-prefixes ;
@P.CASE.prv@PREF%-CAR%-:@P.CASE.prv@%{Æ%}вн%>%{Æ%}%> N-deriv-prefixes ;


LEXICON N-deriv-prefixes
FEM%-:ӈ%{Æ%}в%{ы%}%> NOMINALS ;
INTS%-:ԓ%{ы%}ги%> NOMINALS ;
INTS%-:т%{Æ%}ӈ%> NOMINALS ;
RESTR%-:%{Æ%}м%> NOMINALS ;
SEEM%-:м%{Æ%}ԓ%> NOMINALS ;
APPR%-:м%{Æ%}ч%> NOMINALS ;
APPR%-:м%{Æ%}c%> NOMINALS ;
AUTH%-:ԓ%{ы%}г%> NOMINALS ;
: NOMINALS ;


LEXICON NOMINALS
: PRE-NOUNS ;
: Nouns ;
: Pronouns ;
: Adverbs ;


LEXICON INTER-NOUNS
: Nouns ;


LEXICON CASES-ANIM

! @D.CASE@%<aa%>%<ess%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}н K ;
! : CASES-ANIM-OBL ;
!
!
! LEXICON CASES-ANIM-OBL
@D.CASE@%.NOM%.PL:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}нти K ;
@D.CASE@%-AN%.INS:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%} K ;
! @D.CASE@%<aa%>%<pl%>%<erg%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}рык K ;
! @D.CASE@%-AN%.DAT:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%-AN%.PL%-LOC:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}рык K ;
@D.CASE@%AN%.PL%-DAT:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}рыкы%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%-AN%.DAT:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}на K ;
%-AN%.PL:%>%{ы%}р CASES-OBL ;


LEXICON CASES-OBL                             !!

@D.CASE@%-PL:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}т%{и%} K ;
@D.CASE@%-INS:@D.CASE@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%-EQU:@D.CASE@%>у K ;
@D.CASE@%-LOC:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}к K ;
@D.CASE@%-DAT:@D.CASE@%>%{G%}ты%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%-ABL:@D.CASE@%>%{G%}%{ы%}пы%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%-ORI:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}гйит K ;
@D.CASE@%-IN:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}чыку K ;
@D.CASE@%-PROL:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}еквэ%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%-BOTTOM:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}йиӈкы K ;
@D.CASE@:@D.CASE@ POSS ;
@D.CASE@:@D.CASE@ REL ;

! circumfixes
@R.CASE.com@%-COM:@R.CASE.com@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} K ;
@R.CASE.assoc@%-ASSOC:@R.CASE.assoc@%>%{ы%}ма%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@R.CASE.prv@%-CAR:@R.CASE.prv@%>%{ы%}к%{Æ%} K ;
@R.CASE.prv@%-CAR:@R.CASE.prv@%>%{ы%}к NEG-NOUN-PART ;




LEXICON N-Ia-AATGYR                                   ! bare stem

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
: N-OBL ;


! LEXICON N-Ia-JYNYR                                ! bare stem with n/ng alteration
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
! : N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-Ib-ANGKY                                   ! stem-final vowel reduction

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%{°%} K ;
: N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-Ic-AJKOL                                   ! stem-final vowel deletion

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%{·%} K ;
: N-OBL ;


! LEXICON N-Ic-EJNETKUNEN                          ! vowel deletion with n/ng alteration
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%{·%} K ;
! : N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-II-VIIL-ABS ! a-VIIL-ABS                               ! full reduplication

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;


! LEXICON N-IIb-VAJP-ABS                               ! partial reduplication
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;


LEXICON N-III-AVYNRAL                                   ! n absolutive

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}н K ;
: N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-IV-ARAPA                                   ! ngy absolutive

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}ӈы K ;
: N-OBL ;


! LEXICON N-IV-QORA                                ! qora-qaa
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}ӈы K ;
! : N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-Vv-AVEEN                                   ! irregular; в-oblique

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
:в N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-Vvy-AGNOTVAN                               ! irregular; в-oblique; ы-abs

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ы K ;
:в N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-SING-AJOPYCH                               ! lg singulative

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%-NOM%.SING:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}ԓгын%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@U.itsa.noun@:@U.itsa.noun@ CASES-OBL ;
: N-DERIV-SUFF ;


LEXICON N-SING-EPEEPEG                               ! lyng singulative

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%-NOM%.SING:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}ԓыӈын%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@U.itsa.noun@:@U.itsa.noun@ CASES-OBL ;
: N-DERIV-SUFF ;


LEXICON N-VANGQASQOR-ABS

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;


LEXICON N-OBL
@U.itsa.noun@:@U.itsa.noun@ CASES-OBL ;
@U.itsa.noun@:@U.itsa.noun@ CASES-ANIM ;
! : N-DERIV-PREF ;
!
!
!
! LEXICON N-DERIV-PREF
! %<f%>%[%+f%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
! %<ints%>%[%+ints%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
! %<ints2%>%[%+ints2%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
! %<approx%>%[%+approx%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
! %<restr%>%[%+restr%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
! %<auth%>%[%+auth%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
: N-DERIV-SUFF ;


LEXICON N-DERIV-SUFF

%<rel_n%>:%>%{ы%}ԓь N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}ԓӄыԓ N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}чь N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}ёԓг N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%-FEM:%>%{ы%}ӈ%{Æ%}выт N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%-FEM:%>%{ы%}ӈ%{Æ%}в N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%<pers_n%>:%>%{ы%}вйи N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%<dim%>:%>%{ы%}ӄ%{Æ%}й N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%<aug%>:%>%{ы%}ч%{ы%}%{N%} N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%-AUG:%>%{ы%}йӈ N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%-COLL:%>%{ы%}мк N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%-NUMBER:%>%{ы%}тку N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%-GROUP:%>%{ы%}гинив N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%-PIECE:%>%{ы%}тъуԓ N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
%-NMLZ:%>%{ы%}гырг%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} N-DERIV-SUFF-T "weight: 0.5" ;
: N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;



LEXICON N-DERIV-SUFF-T

! : N-DERIV-PREF ;
%<rel_n%>:%>%{ы%}ԓь N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}ԓӄыԓ N-DERIV-I "weight: 0.5" ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}чь N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}ёԓг N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-FEM:%>%{ы%}ӈ%{Æ%}выт N-DERIV-I "weight: 0.5" ;
%-FEM:%>%{ы%}ӈ%{Æ%}в N-DERIV-I "weight: 0.5" ;
%<pers_n%>:%>%{ы%}вйи N-DERIV-I "weight: 0.5" ;
%<dim%>:%>%{ы%}ӄ%{Æ%}й N-DERIV-I "weight: 0.5" ;
%<aug%>:%>%{ы%}ч%{ы%}%{N%} N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-AUG:%>%{ы%}йӈ N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-COLL:%>%{ы%}мк N-DERIV-I "weight: 0.5" ;
%-NUMBER:%>%{ы%}тку N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-GROUP:%>%{ы%}гинив N-DERIV-I "weight: 0.5" ;
%-PIECE:%>%{ы%}тъуԓ N-DERIV-I "weight: 0.5" ;
%-NMLZ:%>%{ы%}гырг%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
! cross to verbs
@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%-VB:@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%>%{Æ%}т V-IV ;
@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%-CS:@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%>%{Æ%}в V-IV ;
! compounds
! @D.complex@@P.complex.cmp@%<cmp%>%+:@D.complex@@P.complex.cmp@%>%{ы%} Nouns ;
! Incorporation
! %<incorp%>%+:%>%{ы%} Verbs "weight: 0.5" ;
@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%<incorp%/%>%+:@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%>%{ы%} Verbs "weight: 0.5" ;
! cross to adj
@D.CASE@@R.itsa.adj@:@D.CASE@@R.itsa.adj@ V-IV-AFFIX ;
! адвербные деривации
@D.CASE@%-ADV%.PROL:@D.CASE@%>ата ADV ;



! : N-DERIV-SPACIAL ;
!
!
! LEXICON N-DERIV-SPACIAL
%-TOP:%>%{ы%}ткын%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} N-DERIV-I "weight: 0.5" ;
%-NEAR:%>%{ы%}ӈӄача N-DERIV-Ic "weight: 0.5" ;
! %<near%>:%>%{ы%}ӈӄаса N-DERIV-Ic "weight: 0.5" ;
%-EDGE:%>%{ы%}ԓг N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-EDGE:%>%{ы%}ԓэӈ N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-SIDE:%>%{ы%}чурм N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
! %<side%>:%>%{ы%}cурм N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-BOTTOM:%>%{ы%}йиӈ N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-BOTTOM:%>%{ы%}гиӈ N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-EXT:%>%{ы%}йикви N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-AMONG:%>%{ы%}ԓыку N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-IN:%>%{ы%}чыку N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-SURF:%>%{ы%}чӄ N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;
%-FRONT:%>%{ы%}тэгн N-DERIV-III "weight: 0.5" ;




LEXICON NEG-NOUN-PART
! причастия
! %<act%>:%>%{ы%}ԓь N-III-AVYNRAL ; ! INTO-N-III ;
! %-INS%-ATTR:%>%{T%}%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}ԓь N-NEG-PART ; ! INTO-N-I ;
%-ATTR:%>%{ы%}ԓь N-NEG-PART ;
! %<pass%>%<neg%>:%>%{ы%}ԓь%>%{T%}%{Æ%} N-Ia-AATGYR ; ! INTO-N-I ;
! %<pass%>%<neg%>:%>%{ы%}ԓь%>%{Æ%} N-NEG-PART ;

LEXICON POSS
! different possessed, mark on the possessor
%-POSS%-1SG:%>ин%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}гым N-DERIV-I ;
%-POSS%-2SG:%>ин%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}гыт N-DERIV-I ;
%-POSS%-3SG:%>ин%{Æ%} N-DERIV-Ic ;
%-POSS%-1PL:%>ин%{Æ%}%{ы%}%>мури N-DERIV-I ;
%-POSS%-2PL:%>ин%{Æ%}%{ы%}%>тури N-DERIV-I ;
%-POSS%-PL:%>ин%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}т%{и%} N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-1SG:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин%{Æ%}%>гым N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-2SG:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин%{Æ%}%>гыт N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-3SG:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-1PL:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин%{Æ%}%>мури N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-2PL:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин%{Æ%}%>тури N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-PL:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин%{Æ%}%>т%{и%} N-DERIV-I ;


LEXICON POSS-PTCP
! different possessed, mark on the possessor
%-POSS%-1SG:%>ин%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}гым N-PTCP-I ;
%-POSS%-2SG:%>ин%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}гыт N-PTCP-I ;
%-POSS%-3SG:%>ин%{Æ%} N-PTCP-Ic ;
%-POSS%-1PL:%>ин%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}мури N-PTCP-I ;
%-POSS%-2PL:%>ин%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}тури N-PTCP-I ;
%-POSS%-PL:%>ин%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}т%{и%} N-PTCP-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-1SG:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин%{Æ%}%>гым N-PTCP-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-2SG:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин%{Æ%}%>гыт N-PTCP-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-3SG:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин N-PTCP-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-1PL:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин%{Æ%}%>мури N-PTCP-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-2PL:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин%{Æ%}%>тури N-PTCP-I ;
%<pl%>%-POSS%-PL:%>%{ы%}рг%>ин%{Æ%}%>т%{и%} N-PTCP-I ;


! different possessors, mark on the possessed
%<px1sg%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}гым K ;
%<px2sg%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}гыт K ;
%<px3sg%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}н K ;
%<px1pl%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}мури K ;
%<px2pl%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}тури K ;
%<px3pl%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}т%{и%} K ;

LEXICON REL
%-REL:%>%{ы%}кин N-DERIV-I ;

! LEXICON PERS-NUM-CLITICS
! %-1SG:%>%{I%}гым K ;
! %-2SG:%>%{I%}гыт K ;
! %-3SG:%>%{ы%}ӄин K ;
! %-1PL:%>%{ы%}мури K ;
! %-2PL:%>%{ы%}тури K ;
! %-3PL:%>%{ы%}ӄин%{Æ%}т K ;
! %<3pl%>:%>%{ы%}кин%{Æ%}т K ;


!!! FIXME

LEXICON N-PTCP-I
: K ;
: N-OBL ;

LEXICON N-PTCP-Ic
:%{·%} K ;
: N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-DERIV-I
@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
: N-OBL ;

LEXICON N-DERIV-Ic
@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%{·%} K ;
: N-OBL ;

LEXICON N-DERIV-III
@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}н K ;
: N-OBL ;

! LEXICON INTO-N-I
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
! : N-OBL ;
!
! LEXICON INTO-N-III
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}н K ;
! : N-OBL ;

LEXICON N-NEG-PART
: POSS-PTCP ;

LEXICON INTO-N-NEG-PART
@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ POSS-PTCP ;
@U.itsa.noun@:@U.itsa.noun@%>ин%{Æ%} N-OBL ;
!
! LEXICON INTO-N-Vv                                   ! irregular; в-oblique
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
! @U.itsa.noun@:@U.itsa.noun@в N-OBL ;
!
! LEXICON INTO-N-Ic
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%.NOM%.SG:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%{·%} K ;
! : N-OBL ;

LEXICON K
: # ;
%<part%>:%>э # ;
%<part%>:%>%{ы%}ӈэ # ;
%<emph%>:%>ъым # ;    !!! FIXME
%<clitic%>:%>%{ы%}рээн # ;
